Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF62.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1466HH (4) 91 dg/jh H.F. 62 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 554I.1 Publication and distribution 1 of obscene material on the internet ââ age verification. 2 1. For purposes of this chapter: 3 a. âInteractive computer serviceâ means the same as that 4 term is defined in 47 U.S.C. Â§230. 5 b. âObscene materialâ means the same as defined in section 6 728.1. 7 2. A commercial entity that knowingly or intentionally 8 publishes or distributes obscene material on the internet shall 9 verify that any person attempting to access obscene material is 10 not a minor through the use of any of the following: 11 a. A commercially available database that is regularly used 12 by businesses or governmental entities for the purpose of age 13 and identity verification. 14 b. Another commercially reasonable method of age and 15 identity verification. 16 3. A commercial entity that violates the provisions of 17 this section shall be subject to civil liability for damages 18 resulting from a minorâs access to obscene material and 19 reasonable attorney fees and costs. 20 4. This section shall not be construed to impose civil 21 liability on a provider or user of an interactive computer 22 service on the internet. 23